Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1354.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 511 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 511. School Athletics, Publications, and Organizations.--* * *(b.2) A school district in which a private school student is a resident shall permit the student to participate in any extracurricular activity that the school district offers if the student is able to fulfill all of the requirements of participation associated with the extracurricular activity and 1234567891011121314151617181920 the private school that the student attends does not offer the same extracurricular activity.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1354PN1542 - 2 - 1234